da: Forarbejdningsmetode for ris: Brun (fuldkorn); I flager (poha); Beriget; Håndstødt; Instant/hurtigkogende; Parboiled; Forkogt; Spiret/GABA; Hvid (poleret); Andet
el: Μέθοδος επεξεργασίας ρυζιού: Καστανό (ολικής άλεσης); Σε νιφάδες (poha); Εμπλουτισμένο; Κοπανισμένο στο χέρι; Στιγμιαίο / γρήγορου βρασμού; Parboiled (υγροθερμικής επεξεργασίας); Προμαγειρεμένο; Φυτρωμένο / GABA; Λευκό (αποφλοιωμένο/γυαλισμένο); Άλλο
es: Método de procesamiento de arroz: Integral (grano entero); En hojuelas (poha); Fortificado/enriquecido; Machacado a mano; Instantáneo/de cocción rápida; Vaporizado; Precocido; Germinado/GABA; Blanco (pulido); Otro
pt-BR: Arroz, método de processamento: Integral; Em flocos (poha); Fortificado / enriquecido; Pilado à mão; Instantâneo / cozimento rápido; Parboilizado; Pré-cozido; Germinado / GABA; Branco (polido); Outro
tr: Pirinç işleme yöntemi: Esmer (tam tahıllı); Ezilmiş (poha); Takviyeli / zenginleştirilmiş; Elde dövülmüş; Hazır / hızlı pişen; Yarı haşlanmış; Önceden pişirilmiş; Filizlenmiş / GABA; Beyaz (parlatılmış); Diğer
pt-PT: Método de processamento do arroz: Integral (grão inteiro); Em flocos (poha); Fortificado/enriquecido; Pilado à mão; Instantâneo/cozedura rápida; Estufado; Pré-cozido; Germinado/GABA; Branco (polido); Outro
de: Reisverarbeitungsmethode: Braun (Vollkorn); Geflockt (Poha); Angereichert; Handgestampft; Instant / schnellkochend; Parboiled; Vorgekocht; Gekeimt / GABA; Weiß (poliert); Sonstiges
it: Metodo di lavorazione del riso: Integrale; In fiocchi (poha); Fortificato/arricchito; Pestato a mano; Istantaneo/a cottura rapida; Parboiled; Precotto; Germogliato/GABA; Bianco (raffinato); Altro
en: Rice processing method: Brown (whole grain); Flaked (poha); Fortified / enriched; Hand-pounded; Instant / quick-cooking; Parboiled; Pre-cooked; Sprouted / GABA; White (polished); Other
hr-HR: Metoda obrade riže: Smeđa (cjelovito zrno); U pahuljicama (poha); Obogaćena; Ručno usitnjena; Brzokuhaća; Prokuhana (parboiled); Prethodno skuhana; Proklijala / GABA; Bijela (polirana); Ostalo
ru: Метод обработки риса: Коричневый (цельнозерновой); Хлопья (поха); Обогащенный / витаминизированный; Ручной обрушевки; Быстрого приготовления; Пропаренный; Предварительно сваренный; Пророщенный / ГАМК; Белый (шлифованный); Другое
nb: Behandlingsmetode for ris: Brun (fullkorn); Flaket (poha); Beriket / tilsatt vitaminer; Håndstampet; Hurtigris / lettkokt; Parboiled; Forkokt; Spiret / GABA; Hvit (polert); Annet
ja: 米加工方法: 玄米（全粒穀物）; フレーク（ポハ）; 強化/栄養強化; 手搗き; インスタント/早炊き; パーボイル; 調理済み; 発芽/GABA; 精白米; その他
ro-RO: Metodă de procesare a orezului: Brun (integral); Sub formă de fulgi (poha); Fortificat/Îmbogățit; Zdrobit manual; Instant/Fierbere rapidă; Prefiert (Parboiled); Prefiert; Germinat / GABA; Alb (decorticat); Altele
ko: 쌀 가공 방식: 현미(통곡물); 플레이크(포하); 영양 강화; 수작업 도정; 인스턴트/퀵 쿠킹; 파보일드; 사전 조리; 발아/가바; 백미(도정); 기타
fr: Procédé de transformation du riz: Complet (grain entier); En flocons (poha); Fortifié / enrichi; Pilé à la main; Instantané / cuisson rapide; Étuvé; Pré-cuit; Germé / GABA; Blanc (poli); Autre
vi: Phương pháp chế biến gạo: Gạo lứt (nguyên cám); Gạo cán dẹt (Poha); Bổ sung / làm giàu dưỡng chất; Giã tay; Ăn liền / nấu nhanh; Đồ chín (Parboiled); Nấu chín sẵn; Nảy mầm / GABA; Trắng (được xát kỹ); Khác
zh-CN: 大米加工方法: 糙米（全谷物）; 压片（波哈米）; 强化/浓缩; 手工捣碎; 即食/速煮; 蒸谷米; 预煮; 发芽/GABA; 白米（精米）; 其他
lt-LT: Ryžių apdorojimo būdas: Rudieji (viso grūdo); Dribsniai („Poha“); Praturtinti; Grūsti rankomis; Greitai paruošiami; Plikyti; Apvirti; Daiginti / GABA; Baltieji (šlifuoti); Kita
hu: Rizsfeldolgozás módja: Barna (teljes kiőrlésű); Pelyhesített (poha); Dúsított; Kézzel hántolt; Instant / gyorsfőzésű; Előfőzött (parboiled); Előfőzött; Csíráztatott / GABA; Fehér (fényezett); Egyéb
pl: Metoda obróbki ryżu: Brązowy (pełnoziarnisty); W płatkach (poha); Wzbogacany; Ręcznie łuskany; Błyskawiczny / szybkiego gotowania; Parboiled; Wstępnie ugotowany; Kiełkowany / GABA; Biały (polerowany); Inne
cs: Metoda zpracování rýže: Hnědá (celozrnná); Vločky (poha); Obohacená; Ručně loupaná; Instantní / rychlovařná; Parboiled; Předvařená; Naklíčená / GABA; Bílá (leštěná); Jiné
sl-SI: Namen nadomestnega dela: Rjavi (polnozrnati); Kosmiči (poha); Obogateno; Ročno luščeno; Instant / za hitro kuhanje; Parboiled; Predkuhano; Kaljeno / GABA; Belo (polirano); Drugo
sv: Bearbetningsmetod för ris: Råris (fullkorn); Flingor (poha); Berikat; Handstampat; Snabbris/snabbkokande; Parboiled; Förkokt; Groddat/GABA; Vitt (polerat); Annat
sk-SK: Metóda spracovania ryže: Hnedá (celozrnná); Vločky (poha); Fortifikovaná/obohatená; Ručne drvená; Instantná/rýchlo sa váriaca; Predparená (parboiled); Predvarená; Naklíčená/GABA; Biela (leštená); Iné
nl: Rijsverwerkingsmethode: Zilvervlies (volkoren); Gevlokt (poha); Verrijkt; Met de hand gemalen; Instant / snelkokend; Parboiled; Voorgekookt; Gekiemd / GABA; Wit (gepolijst); Overig
zh-TW: 稻米加工方式: 糙米 (全穀); 米片 (Poha); 強化 / 營養添加; 手工搗米; 即食 / 快煮; 半熟; 預煮; 發芽 / GABA; 白米 (精白); 其他
fi: Riisin käsittelymenetelmä: Tumma (täysjyvä); Hiutaloitu (poha); Täydennetty / rikastettu; Käsin survottu; Pikariisi / nopeasti kypsyvä; Parboiled; Esikypsennetty; Idätetty / GABA; Valkoinen (hiottu); Muu
bg-BG: Метод за обработка на ориз: Кафяв (пълнозърнест); На люспи (poha); Обогатен; Ръчно счукан; Инстантен/бързо сваряващ се; Бланширан; Предварително сварен; Покълнал/GABA; Бял (полиран); Други
th: วิธีการแปรรูปข้าว: ข้าวกล้อง (โฮลเกรน); แผ่น (โพฮา); เสริมสารอาหาร / อุดมไปด้วยสารอาหาร; ตำด้วยมือ; กึ่งสำเร็จรูป / ปรุงสุกเร็ว; ข้าวนึ่ง; ปรุงสุกแล้ว; เพาะงอก / กาบา; ข้าวขาว (ขัดสี); อื่นๆ